Washington statutes.
RCW 18.310.040

Applications—Original and renewals—Surety bonds.

(1) Applications for licensure must be made to the department on forms approved by the director. A license is valid for one year and must be renewed on or before the expiration date. Applications for original and renewal licenses must include a statement confirming that the company must comply with applicable rules and that the company understands the penalties for misconduct.

(2) The appropriate fees must accompany all applications for original licensure and renewal.

(3)(a) Each applicant shall file and maintain a surety bond, approved by the director, executed by the applicant as obligor and by a surety company authorized to do a surety business in this state as surety, whose liability as the surety may not exceed in the aggregate the penal sum of the bond. The penal sum of the bond must be a minimum of one hundred thousand dollars. The bond must run to the state of Washington as obligee for the use and benefit of the state and of any person or persons who may have a cause of action against the obligor under this chapter. The bond must be conditioned that the obligor as licensee will faithfully conform to and abide by this chapter and all the rules adopted under this chapter. The bond will pay to the state and any person or persons having a cause of action against the obligor all moneys that may become due and owing to the state and those persons under and by virtue of this chapter.

(b) If the director determines that surety bonds are not readily available to appraisal management companies, the director may accept a cash bond or other security in lieu of the surety bond required by this section. The security accepted in lieu of a surety bond must be in an amount equal to the penal sum of the required bond. All obligations and remedies relating to surety bonds apply to deposits and other security filed in lieu of surety bonds.

[ 2019 c 74 s 1; 2013 c 90 s 1; 2010 c 179 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2019 c 74: "(1) Section 1 of this act takes effect June 4, 2020.

(2) Sections 2 through 4 of this act take effect July 31, 2019." [ 2019 c 74 s 5.]